Utah, session 2026, SB63.
Section 1. Section 76-5-102 is amended to read:76-5-102. Assault.(1)(a)As used in this section, "chokehold" means a restraining hold in which one individual encircles the neck of another individual in a viselike grip using an arm.(b)Terms defined in Section 76-1-101.5 apply to this section.(2)An actor commits assault if the actor:(a)attempts, with unlawful force or violence, to inflict bodily injury on an individual; or(b)commits an act, with unlawful force or violence, that:(i)causes bodily injury to an individual; or(ii)creates a substantial risk of bodily injury to an individual.(3)(a)A Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), a violation of Subsection (2) is a class B misdemeanor.(b)Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), a A violation of Subsection (2) is a class A misdemeanor if:(i)the actor causes substantial bodily injury to an individual; or(ii)the individual is pregnant and the actor has knowledge of the pregnancy.(4)The fact that the actor caused serious bodily injury to an individual is not a defense to a violation of this section.(5)This section does not apply to an actor's use of a chokehold on another individual if:(a)the chokehold is done as part of training for, or participating in, a practice or sport in which a chokehold is a known and acceptable practice, including martial arts, wrestling, or mixed martial arts; and(b)the other individual is also training for, or participating in, the same practice or sport in which a chokehold is a known and acceptable practice.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 76-5-103 is amended to read:76-5-103. Aggravated assault.(1)(a)As used in this section, "targeting:(i)"Chokehold" means the same as that term is defined in Section 76-5-102.(ii)"Targeting a law enforcement officer" means the same as that term is defined in Section 76-5-202.(b)Terms defined in Section 76-1-101.5 apply to this section.(2)An actor commits aggravated assault if:(a)(i)the actor attempts, with unlawful force or violence, to do bodily injury to another;(ii)the actor makes a threat, accompanied by a show of immediate force or violence, to do bodily injury to another; or(iii)the actor commits an act, committed with unlawful force or violence, that causes bodily injury to another or creates a substantial risk of bodily injury to another; and(b)the actor's conduct described in Subsection (2)(a) includes:(i)the use of:(A)a dangerous weapon; or(B)a motor vehicle;(ii)any act that intentionally or knowingly impedes the breathing or the circulation of blood of another individual by the actor's use of unlawful force or violence  by:(A)applying pressure to the neck or throat of an individual; or(B)obstructing the nose, mouth, or airway of an individual; or(iii)other means or force likely to produce death or serious bodily injury.(3)(a)A Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b) or (c), a violation of Subsection (2) is a third degree felony.(b)Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), Except as provided in Subsection (3)(c), a violation of Subsection (2) is a second degree felony if:(i)the act results in serious bodily injury; or(ii)an act under Subsection (2)(b)(ii) produces a loss of consciousness.(c)Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a) or (b), a A violation of Subsection (2) is a first degree felony if the conduct constitutes targeting a law enforcement officer and results in serious bodily injury.(4)This section does not apply to an actor's use of a chokehold on another individual if:(a)the chokehold is done as part of training for, or participating in, a practice or sport in which a chokehold is a known and acceptable practice, including martial arts, wrestling, or mixed martial arts; and(b)the other individual is also training for, or participating in, the same practice or sport in which a chokehold is a known and acceptable practice.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.